hu: Nyélhossz állíthatósága: Állítható (több részből álló); Fix hosszúságú; Teleszkópos/kihúzható; Egyéb
fi: Kahvan pituuden säätö: Säädettävä (moniosainen); Kiinteä pituus; Teleskooppinen/jatkettava; Muu
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh độ dài tay cầm: Có thể điều chỉnh (nhiều đoạn); Độ dài cố định; Có thể thu gọn/kéo dài; Khác
cs: Nastavitelnost délky násady: Nastavitelná (vícesekční); Pevná délka; Teleskopická/výsuvná; Jiné
en: Handle length adjustability: Adjustable (multi-section); Fixed length; Telescopic/extendable; Other
pl: Regulacja długości uchwytu: Regulowana (wieloczęściowa); Stała długość; Teleskopowa / rozsuwana; Pozostałe
nl: Verstelbare handgreeplengte: Verstelbaar (meerdelig); Vaste lengte; Telescopisch/uitschuifbaar; Overig
es: Ajustabilidad de la longitud del mango: Ajustable (multisección); Longitud fija; Telescópico/extensible; Otros
hr-HR: Prilagodljivost duljine ručke: Podesivo (višedijelno); Fiksna duljina; Produživa; Ostalo
sl-SI: Nastavitev dolžine ročaja: Nastavljivo (večdelno); Fiksna dolžina; Teleskopski/raztegljiv; Druga
zh-CN: 手柄长度可调性: 可调节（多段式）; 固定长度; 伸缩式/可伸缩; 其他
ko: 손잡이 길이 조절 가능 여부: 조절 가능(다단식); 고정 길이; 텔레스코픽/확장형; 기타
lt-LT: Koto ilgio reguliavimo galimybė: Reguliuojamas (daugiasluoksnis); Fiksuotas ilgis; Teleskopinis/ištraukiamas; Kita
ro-RO: Reglarea lungimii mânerului: Ajustabil (multisecțiune); Lungime fixă; Telescopic/extensibil; Altele
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť dĺžky rukoväte: Nastaviteľná (viacdielna); Pevná dĺžka; Teleskopická/rozťahovacia; Iné
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do comprimento da pega: Ajustável (multi-secções); Comprimento fixo; Telescópico/extensível; Outro
sv: Handtagslängdsjustering: Justerbar (flersektionerad); Fast längd; Teleskopisk / utdragbar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Ajuste do comprimento do cabo: Ajustável (multisseções); Comprimento fixo; Telescópico/extensível; Outro
fr: Réglage de la longueur du manche: Réglable (multisection); Longueur fixe; Télescopique/extensible; Autre
bg-BG: Регулируема дължина на дръжката: Регулируемо (многосекционно); Фиксирана дължина; Телескопично/разтегателно; Друго
de: Verstellbarkeit der Grifflänge: Verstellbar (mehrteilig); Feste Länge; Teleskopierbar/ausziehbar; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 桿件長度可調性: 可調節 (多段式); 固定長度; 伸縮式/可延展; 其他
ja: ハンドルの長さ調整: 調整可能（マルチセクション）; 固定長; 伸縮式; その他
da: Justerbar skaftlængde: Justerbar (flere sektioner); Fast længde; Teleskopisk/udtrækkelig; Andet
nb: Lengdejustering for håndtak: Justerbar (flerseksjoner); Fast lengde; Teleskopisk/uttrekkbar; Annet
th: ความสามารถในการปรับความยาวด้ามจับ: ปรับความยาวได้ (หลายท่อน); ความยาวคงที่; ยืดหดได้/ปรับขยายได้; อื่นๆ
el: Ρύθμιση μήκους λαβής: Ρυθμιζόμενο (πολλαπλών τμημάτων); Σταθερό μήκος; Τηλεσκοπικό/επεκτάσιμο; Άλλο
ru: Регулировка длины рукоятки: Регулируемый (многосекционный); Фиксированная длина; Телескопический/выдвижной; Другое
it: Regolazione della lunghezza del manico: Regolabile (multi-sezione); Lunghezza fissa; Telescopico/estensibile; Altro
tr: Sap uzunluğu ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir (çok bölümlü); Sabit uzunluk; Teleskopik/uzatılabilir; Diğer